Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
MEETINGS

7-107-101. Annual meeting.

A corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time and date stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not so stated or fixed, at a time and date stated in or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors.

Unless the board of directors determines to hold the meeting solely by means of remote communication in accordance with section 7-107-108:

Annual shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, at a place stated in or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors.

If no place is stated in or fixed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section does not affect the validity of any corporate action and does not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 764, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1315, § 15, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 164, § 9, effective April 19.

7-107-102. Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized by the bylaws or resolution of the board of directors to call such a meeting; or

If the corporation receives one or more written demands for the meeting, stating the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held, signed and dated by the holders of shares representing at least ten percent of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under section 7-107-103 or 7-107-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section is the date of the earliest of any of the demands pursuant to which the meeting is called, or the date that is sixty days before the date the first of such demands is received by the corporation, whichever is later.

Unless the board of directors determines to hold the meeting solely by means of remote communication in accordance with section 7-107-108:

Special shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or, if not stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, at a place stated in or fixed in accordance with a resolution of the board of directors.

If no place is stated in or fixed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the notice of the meeting required by section 7-107-105 (3) may be conducted at a special shareholders' meeting.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 764, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1316, § 16, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 165, § 10, effective April 19.

7-107-103. Court-ordered meeting.

The holding of a meeting of the shareholders may be summarily ordered by the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office is located or, if the corporation has no principal office in this state, by the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the corporation has no registered agent, by the district court for the city and county of Denver:

On application of any shareholder entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six months after the close of the corporation's most recently ended fiscal year or fifteen months after its last annual meeting; or

On application of any person who participated in a call of or demand for a special meeting effective under section 7-107-102 (1), if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty days after the date of the call or the date the last of the demands necessary to require the calling of the meeting was received by the corporation pursuant to section 7-107-102 (1)(b), as the case may be; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, fix a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the notice of the meeting, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary or appropriate to accomplish the holding of the meeting.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 765, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 1316, § 17, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 2317, § 234, effective July 1, 2004.

7-107-104. Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation require that such action be taken at a shareholders' meeting, any action required or permitted by articles 101 to 117 of this title to be taken at a shareholders' meeting may be taken without a meeting if:

All of the shareholders entitled to vote thereon consent to such action in writing; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1.5) of this section and if expressly provided for in the articles of incorporation, the shareholders holding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all of the shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted consent to such action in writing.

(1.5) If shares are entitled to be voted cumulatively in the election of directors, shareholders may take action under this section to elect or remove directors only if:

The articles of incorporation do not require that such action be taken at a shareholders' meeting; and

All of the shareholders entitled to vote in the election or removal sign writings describing and consenting to the election or removal of the same directors and the writings are received by the corporation in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

No action taken pursuant to this section is effective unless, within sixty days after the date the corporation first receives a document describing and consenting to the action and signed by a shareholder, the corporation has received documents that describe and consent to the action, signed by shareholders holding at least the number of shares entitled to vote on the action as required by subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section, as the case may be, disregarding any such document that has been revoked pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Action taken pursuant to this section is effective as of the date the corporation receives the last document necessary to effect the action unless all of the documents necessary to effect the action state another date as the effective date of the action, in which case the stated date is the effective date of the action.

A consent given by electronic transmission is delivered to the corporation upon the earliest of:

When the consent enters an information processing system, if any, designated by the corporation for receiving consents if the electronic transmission is in a form capable of being processed by that system and the corporation is able to retrieve that electronic transmission. Whether the corporation has designated an information processing system to receive consents is determined by the articles of incorporation, by the bylaws, or from the context and surrounding circumstances, including the conduct of the corporation.

When a paper reproduction of the consent is delivered to the corporation's principal place of business or an officer or agent of the corporation having custody of the book in which proceedings of meetings of shareholders or members are recorded;

When a paper reproduction of the consent is delivered to the corporation's registered office in this state by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested; or

When delivered in such other manner, if any, provided by resolution of the board of directors or governing body of the corporation.

A consent given by electronic transmission is delivered under this section even if no person is aware of its receipt. Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system establishes that a consent given by electronic transmission was received but does not, by itself, establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

Any shareholder who has signed a document describing and consenting to action taken pursuant to this section may revoke the consent by a document signed and dated by the shareholder describing the action and stating that the shareholder's prior consent thereto is revoked, if the document is received by the corporation prior to the effectiveness of the action.

If not otherwise fixed under subsection (7) of this section or section 7-107-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action pursuant to this section or entitled to be given notice under subsection (5.5) of this section of action taken pursuant to this section is the date the corporation first receives a document upon which the action is taken pursuant to this section.

Action taken under this section has the same effect as action taken at a meeting of shareholders and may be described as such in any document.

(5.5) If action is taken under subsection (1) of this section with less than unanimous consent of all shareholders entitled to vote upon the action, the corporation or shareholders taking the action shall, upon receipt by the corporation of all documents necessary to effect the action, give notice of the action to all shareholders who were entitled to vote upon the action but who have not consented to the action in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section. The notice must contain or be accompanied by the same material, if any, that would have been required under articles 101 to 117 of this title 7 to be given to shareholders in or with a notice of the meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the shareholders.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1316, § 18, effective June 1, 1996.)

The district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the corporation's principal office is located or, if the corporation has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the corporation has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver may, upon application of the corporation or any shareholder who would be entitled to vote on the action at a shareholders' meeting, summarily state a record date for determining shareholders entitled to sign documents consenting to an action under this section and may enter other orders necessary or appropriate to effect the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 766, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2), (3), and (6) amended, p. 1316, § 18, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (7) amended, p. 2318, § 235, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (7) amended and (1.5) and (5.5) added, p. 369, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2021:

(2), (3), (4), (5.5), and (7) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 165, § 11, effective April 19.

7-107-105. Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall give notice to shareholders of the date, time, and place, if any, of each annual and special shareholders' meeting no fewer than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting; except that, if the number of authorized shares is to be increased, the corporation shall give at least thirty days' notice. Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title 7 or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting shall include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under section 7-107-103 or 7-107-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to be given notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders' meeting is the day before the first notice is given to shareholders.

Subject to subsection (5)(b) of this section and unless otherwise required by the bylaws, if an annual or special shareholders' meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, if any, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place, if any, if the new date, time, or place, if any, is announced at the meeting before adjournment.

If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under section 7-107-107, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

(1) and (5) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 166, § 12, effective April 19.

7-107-106. Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by articles 101 to 117 of this title or by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, whether before or after the date or time stated in the notice as the date or time when any action will occur or has occurred. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records, but such delivery and filing shall not be conditions of the effectiveness of the waiver.

A shareholder's attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or defective notice; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 767, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-107. Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing a future date as the record date for one or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to be given notice of a shareholders' meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action, and if the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors may fix a future date as the record date; except that the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting or entitled to be given notice of action so taken shall be determined as provided in section 7-107-104 (4).

A record date fixed under this section shall not be more than seventy days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to be given notice of or to vote at a shareholders' meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 768, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-108. Remote participation in shareholders' meetings - meetings held solely by remote participation.

Shareholders of any class or series of shares may participate in any meeting of shareholders by means of remote communication to the extent the board of directors authorizes participation for that class or series. Participation as a shareholder by means of remote communication is subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors adopts and must be in conformity with subsection (2) of this section.

Shareholders participating in a shareholders' meeting by means of remote communication shall be deemed present and may vote at such a meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures to:

Verify that each person participating remotely as a shareholder is a shareholder; and

Provide the shareholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to communicate and to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting, substantially concurrently with the proceedings.

Unless the bylaws require the meeting of shareholders to be held at a place, the board of directors may determine that a meeting of shareholders will not be held at any place and instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, but only if the corporation implements the measures specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 768, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 167, § 13, effective April 19.